Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB868.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 17.500 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 17.500 to 17.580:
(1) "Approved provider" means a mental health professional licensed or certified in
Kentucky whose scope of practice includes providing mental health treatment
services and who is approved by the Sex Offender Risk Assessment Advisory
Board[,] under administrative regulations promulgated by the board[,] to provide
comprehensive sex offender presentence evaluations or treatment to adults and
youthful offenders[,] as defined in KRS 600.020;
(2) "Authorized personnel" means an agent of state government who is properly
trained in DNA sample collection pursuant to administrative regulation;
(3) "Board" means the Sex Offender Risk Assessment Advisory Board created under
KRS 17.554;
(4) "Cabinet" means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;
(5)[(3)] (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, "criminal offense
against a victim who is a minor" means any of the following offenses if the
victim is under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of the commission of the
offense:
1. Kidnapping, as set forth in KRS 509.040, except by a parent;
2. Unlawful imprisonment, as set forth in KRS 509.020, except by a
parent;
3. Sex crime;
4. Promoting a sexual performance of a minor, as set forth in KRS
531.320;
5. Human trafficking involving commercial sexual activity, as set forth in
KRS 529.100;
Page 1 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
6. Promoting human trafficking involving commercial sexual activity, as
set forth in KRS 529.110;
7. Promoting prostitution, as set forth in KRS 529.040, when the defendant
advances or profits from the prostitution of a person under the age of
eighteen (18);
8. Use of a minor in a sexual performance, as set forth in KRS 531.310;
9. Sexual abuse, as set forth in KRS 510.120 and 510.130;
10. Unlawful transaction with a minor in the first degree, as set forth in KRS
530.064(1)(a);
11. Any offense involving a minor or depictions of a minor, as set forth in
KRS Chapter 531;
12. Any attempt to commit any of the offenses described in subparagraphs
1. to 11. of this paragraph;
13. Solicitation to commit any of the offenses described in subparagraphs 1.
to 11. of this paragraph; or
14. Any offense from another state or territory, any federal offense, or any
offense subject to a court martial of the United States Armed Forces,
which is similar to any of the offenses described in subparagraphs 1. to
13. of this paragraph.
(b) Conduct which is criminal only because of the age of the victim shall not be
considered a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor if the
perpetrator was under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of the commission
of the offense;
(6) "DNA sample" or "deoxyribonucleic acid sample" means a blood or swab
specimen from a person, as prescribed by administrative regulation, that is
required to provide a DNA sample pursuant to KRS 17.170 or 17.510, that shall
be submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory for
Page 2 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
law enforcement identification purposes and inclusion in law enforcement
identification databases;
(7)[(4)] "Law enforcement agency" means any lawfully organized investigative
agency, sheriff's office, police unit, or police force of federal, state, county, urban-
county government, charter county, city, consolidated local government, or a
combination of these, responsible for the detection of crime and the enforcement of
the general criminal federal or state laws;
(8)[(5)] "Registrant" means:
(a) Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older at the time of the offense or
any youthful offender, as defined in KRS 600.020, who has committed:
1. A sex crime; or
2. A criminal offense against a victim who is a minor; or
(b) Any person required to register under KRS 17.510; or
(c) Any sexually violent predator; or
(d) Any person whose sexual offense has been diverted pursuant to KRS 533.250,
until the diversionary period is successfully completed;
(9)[(6)] "Registrant information" means information about a registrant, including:
(a) The registrant's:
1. Name, including any lawful name change together with any[the]
previous name;[,]
2. Social Security number;[,]
3. Age;[,]
4. Race;[,]
5. Sex;[,]
6. Date of birth;[,]
7. Height, weight, hair, and eye color;[,]
8. Fingerprints, palm prints, DNA sample, and a photograph;[,]
Page 3 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
9. Aliases used;[,]
10. Residence;[,]
11. Telephone numbers;
12. Email addresses; and
13. Motor vehicle operator's license number as well as any other
government-issued identification card numbers, if any;[,]
(b) A brief description of the crime or crimes committed;[, and]
(c) The name and address of any place where the registrant:
1. Is enrolled as a student; and
2. Is employed or, if the registrant is employed with no fixed place of
employment, other information describing where the registrant works;
(d) Copies of:
1. Each passport the registrant possesses; and
2. Any document establishing the registrant's immigration status,
including immigration document type and number, if the sex offender
is an alien as defined in 8 U.S.C. sec. 1101(a)(3);
(e) For a vehicle, including watercraft, aircraft, and motor vehicles owned or
routinely operated by the registrant:
1. The license plate number or, if a vehicle has no license plate, the
registration number or other identifier;
2. A description of the vehicle, including the make, model, year
manufactured, and color; and
3. An address or other information describing the location where the
vehicle is habitually parked, docked, or otherwise kept;
(f) Copies of any occupational or professional licenses that authorize the
registrant to engage in an occupation or carry out a trade or business;
(g) Designations used for self-identification or routing in internet
Page 4 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
communications or postings; and
(h) Other information the cabinet determines[,] by administrative regulation[,]
may be useful in the identification of registrants;
(10)[(7)] "Residence" means any place where a person sleeps. For the purposes of this
statute, a registrant may have more than one (1) residence. A registrant is required
to register each residence address;
(11)[(8)] "Sex crime" means:
(a) A felony offense defined in KRS Chapter 510, KRS 529.100 or 529.110
involving commercial sexual activity, 530.020, 530.064(1)(a), 531.125,
531.310, 531.320, 531.335, 531.340, 531.365, 531.366, 531.367, or 531.368.
(b) A felony attempt to commit a felony offense specified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection; or
(c) A federal felony offense, a felony offense subject to a court-martial of the
United States Armed Forces, or a felony offense from another state or a
territory where the felony offense is similar to a felony offense specified in
paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(12)[(9)] "Sexual offender" means any person who has been convicted of,
pled[pleading] guilty to, or entered[entering] an Alford plea to a sex crime as
defined in this section, as of the date the verdict is entered by the court;
(13)[(10)] "Sexually violent predator" means any person who has been subjected to
involuntary civil commitment as a sexually violent predator, or a similar
designation, under a state, territory, or federal statutory scheme; and
(14)[(11) "The board" means the Sex Offender Risk Assessment Advisory Board
created under KRS 17.554;
(12)] "Victim" has the same meaning as in KRS 421.500[;
(13) "DNA sample" or "deoxyribonucleic acid sample" means a blood or swab specimen
from a person, as prescribed by administrative regulation, that is required to provide
Page 5 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
a DNA sample pursuant to KRS 17.170 or 17.510, that shall be submitted to the
Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory for law enforcement
identification purposes and inclusion in law enforcement identification databases;
and
(14) "Authorized personnel" means an agent of state government who is properly trained
in DNA sample collection pursuant to administrative regulation].
Section 2. KRS 17.510 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet shall develop and implement a registration system for registrants which
includes creating a new computerized information file to be accessed through the
Law Information Network of Kentucky.
(2) A registrant shall, on or before the date of his or her release by the court, the parole
board, the cabinet, or any detention facility, register with the appropriate local
probation and parole office in the county in which he or she intends to reside. The
person in charge of the release shall facilitate the registration process.
(3) (a) Any person required to register pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall
be informed of the duty to register by:
1. The court at the time of sentencing if the court grants probation or
conditional discharge or does not impose a penalty of incarceration;[,]
or
2. If incarcerated, by the official in charge of the place of confinement
upon release.
(b) The court and the official shall require the person to read and sign any form
that may be required by the cabinet[,] stating that the duty of the person to
register has been explained to the person. The court and the official in charge
of the place of confinement shall require the releasee to complete the
acknowledgment form and the court or the official shall retain the original
completed form. The official shall then send the form to the Sex Offender
Page 6 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
Registry Section, Department of Kentucky State Police, Frankfort, Kentucky
40601.
(4) (a) The court or the official shall order the person to register with the appropriate
local probation and parole office which shall obtain the person's registrant
information[fingerprints, palm prints, DNA sample, photograph, and a copy
of his or her motor vehicle operator's license as well as any other government-
issued identification cards, if any].
(b) [Thereafter, ]The registrant shall return to the appropriate local probation and
parole office not less than one (1) time every two (2) years in order for a new
photograph to be obtained, and the registrant shall pay the cost of updating the
photo for registration purposes. Any registrant who has not provided palm
prints, a copy of his or her motor vehicle operator's license, or a copy of any
other government-issued identification cards, if any, as of July 14, 2018, shall
provide the information to the appropriate local probation and parole office
when the registrant appears for a new photograph to be obtained. Any change
to a registrant's information[motor vehicle operator's license number or any
other government-issued identification card] after the registrant appears for a
new photograph shall be registered in accordance with subsection (11) of this
section. Failure to comply with this requirement shall be punished as set forth
in subsection (12) of this section.
(5) (a) The appropriate probation and parole office shall send the registration form
containing the registrant information[, fingerprints, palm prints, photograph,
and a copy of his or her motor vehicle operator's license as well as any other
government-issued identification cards, if any,] and any special conditions
imposed by the court or the Parole Board, to the Sex Offender Registry
Section, Department of Kentucky State Police, Frankfort, Kentucky 40601 or
in electronic format on forms designated by the Department of Kentucky
Page 7 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
State Police. The appropriate probation and parole office shall send the DNA
sample to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory in
accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.
(b) The Sex Offender Registry Section, upon request by a state or local law
enforcement agency, shall make available to that agency registrant
information, including a person's fingerprints and photograph, where
available, as well as any special conditions imposed by the court or the Parole
Board.
(c) Any employee of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet who disseminates, or
does not disseminate, registrant information in good-faith compliance with the
requirements of this subsection shall be immune from criminal and civil
liability for the dissemination or lack thereof.
(6) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any person who has
been:
1. Convicted of a sex crime or criminal offense against a victim who is a
minor and has been notified of the duty to register by:[ in]
a. A court of any state or territory, a court of the United States, the
District of Columbia, or any federally recognized Indian tribe;[
or]
b. A similar conviction from a court of competent jurisdiction in any
other country;[,] or
c. A court martial of the United States Armed Forces;[ of a sex crime
or criminal offense against a victim who is a minor and who has
been notified of the duty to register by that state, territory, or
court,] or[ who has been]
2. Committed as a sexually violent predator:
a. Under the laws of another state, laws of a territory, or federal laws,
Page 8 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
or
b. Has a similar commitment[conviction] from a court of competent
jurisdiction in any other country;[,]
shall comply with the registration requirement of this section, including the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section, and shall register with the
appropriate local probation and parole office in the county of residence within
three (3)[five (5)] working days of relocation. [No ]Additional notice of the
duty to register shall not be required of any official charged with a duty of
enforcing the laws of this Commonwealth.
(b) A[No] person shall not be required to register under this subsection for a
juvenile adjudication if such an adjudication in this Commonwealth would not
create a duty to register. This paragraph shall be retroactive.
(7) (a) 1. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if a person:
a. Is required to register under federal law or the laws of another state
or territory;[,] or[ if the person]
b. Has been convicted of an offense in a court of the United States,
the District of Columbia, or any federally recognized Indian
tribe, in a court martial of the United States Armed Forces, or
under the laws of another state or territory that would require
registration if committed in this Commonwealth,
that person upon changing residence from the other state or territory of
the United States to the Commonwealth or upon entering the
Commonwealth for employment, to carry on a vocation, or as a student
shall comply with the registration requirement of this section, including
the requirements of subsection (4) of this section, and shall register
within three (3)[five (5)] working days with the appropriate local
probation and parole office in the county of residence, employment,
Page 9 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
vocation, or schooling.
2. A person required to register under federal law or the laws of another
state or territory shall be presumed to know of the duty to register in the
Commonwealth. As used in this subsection, "employment" or "carry on
a vocation" includes employment that is full-time or part-time for a
period exceeding fourteen (14) days or for an aggregate period of time
exceeding thirty (30) days during any calendar year, whether financially
compensated, volunteered, or for the purpose of government or
educational benefit. As used in this subsection, "student" means a person
who is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis, in any public or private
educational institution, including any secondary school, trade or
professional institution, or institution of higher education.
(b) A[No] person shall not be required to register under this subsection for a
juvenile adjudication if such an adjudication in this Commonwealth would not
create a duty to register. This paragraph shall be retroactive.
(8) The registration form shall be a written or electronic statement signed, either
physically or digitally, by the person that[which] shall include registrant
information, including an up-to-date photograph of the registrant for public
dissemination.
(9) For purposes of KRS 17.500 to 17.580 and 17.991, a post office box number shall
not be considered an address.
(10) (a) If a registrant does not have an established and fixed residence of regular
return, he or she shall report in person no less than every thirty (30) days to
the local probation and parole office in the county in which he or she is
present and register the approximate area where he or she can be located.
(b) If the registrant changes his or her location, employer or employer address, or
school or school address to a new county, the person shall notify his or her
Page 10 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
current local probation and parole office of the new location on or before the
date of the change of location.
(c) The registrant shall also report in person to the appropriate local probation and
parole office in the county of his or her new location, employer or employer
address, or school or school address no later than three (3)[five (5)] working
days after the date of the change of location.
(11) (a) If the residence, employer, or school address of any registrant changes[,] but
the registrant remains in the same county, the registrant[person] shall
register[,] on or before the date of the change of address[,] with the
appropriate local probation and parole office in the county in which he or she
resides.
(b) 1. If the registrant changes his or her residence, employer, or school to a
new county, the person shall notify his or her current local probation and
parole office of the new residence, employer, or school address on or
before the date of the change of address.
2. The registrant shall also register with the appropriate local probation and
parole office in the county of his or her new residence, employer, or
school no later than three (3)[five (5)] working days after the date of the
change of address.
(c) If a registrant's information changes, other than the registrant information
described in subsection (10)(b) and (c) of this section or paragraphs (a) and
(b) of this subsection,[the:
1. Motor vehicle operator's license number or any other government-issued
identification card number of any registrant changes; or
2. Registrant obtains for the first time a motor vehicle operator's license
number or any other government-issued identification card number;
] the registrant shall register the change or addition no later than three (3)[five
Page 11 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
(5)] working days after the date of the change or the date of the addition[,]
with the appropriate local probation and parole office in the county in which
he or she resides.
(d) 1. As soon as a probation and parole office learns of the person's new
address under paragraph (b)1. of this subsection, that probation and
parole office shall notify the appropriate local probation and parole
office in the county of the new address of the effective date of the new
address.
2. As soon as a probation and parole office learns of the person's new
address under paragraph (b)2. of this subsection, that office shall
forward this information as set forth under subsection (5) of this section.
(e) 1. A registrant shall register the following information with the appropriate
local probation and parole office no less than twenty-one (21) days
before traveling outside of the United States:
a. [His or her passport number and country of issue;
b. ]The dates of departure, travel, and return; and
b.[c.] The foreign countries, colonies, territories, or possessions that the
registrant will visit.
2. The registrant shall register the following information with the
appropriate local probation and parole office no later than three (3)[five
(5)] working days after the date of his or her return from traveling
outside of the United States:
a. The date he or she departed, traveled, and returned; and
b. The foreign countries, colonies, territories, or possessions that the
registrant visited.
(12) Any person required to register under this section who knowingly violates any of
the provisions of this section or prior law is guilty of a Class D felony for the first
Page 12 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
offense and a Class C felony for each subsequent offense.
(13) Any person required to register under this section or prior law who knowingly
provides false, misleading, or incomplete information is guilty of a Class D felony
for the first offense and a Class C felony for each subsequent offense.
(14) (a) [The cabinet shall]Any person required to register under this section shall
verify his or her registrant information at least once every:[ the addresses,
names, motor vehicle operator's license numbers, and government-issued
identification card numbers of individuals required to register under this
section. Verification shall occur at least once every]
1. Ninety (90) days for a person required to register under KRS
17.520(2);[, at least once every ]
2. Calendar year for a person required to register under KRS 17.520(3);[,]
and[ at least once every]
3. Thirty (30) days for a person who does not have an established and fixed
residence of regular return.
(b) If the cabinet determines that a person has:
1. Moved without providing his or her new address;
2. Failed to notify the local probation and parole office of his or her
presence in a new county without an established and fixed residence of
regular return; or
3. Other registrant information[A new name, motor vehicle operator's
license number, or government-issued identification card number] that
he or she has not provided;
to the appropriate local probation and parole office or offices as required
under subsection (11)(a), (b), and (c) of this section, the cabinet shall notify
the appropriate local probation and parole office of the newly discovered
information[new address, name, motor vehicle operator's license number, or
Page 13 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
government-issued identification card number] used by the person. The office
shall then forward this information as set forth under subsection (5) of this
section. The cabinet shall attempt to notify the registrant and also notify the
appropriate court, Parole Board, and appropriate Commonwealth's attorney,
sheriff's office, probation and parole office, corrections agency, and law
enforcement agency responsible for the investigation of the report of
noncompliance.
(c) An agency that receives notice of the noncompliance from the cabinet under
paragraph (a) of this subsection:
1. Shall consider revocation of the parole, probation, postincarceration
supervision, or conditional discharge of any person released under its
authority; and
2. Shall notify the appropriate county or Commonwealth's Attorney for
prosecution.
(15) The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section.
(16) The provisions of subsections (10) and (14) of this section relating to registrants
who do not have an established and fixed residence of regular return shall apply to
any person required to register on or after January 1, 2024.
Section 3. KRS 17.520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A registrant, upon his or her release by the court, the Parole Board, the cabinet, or
any detention facility, shall be required to register for a period of time required
under this section.
(2) (a) Lifetime registration is required for:
1. Any person who has been convicted of kidnapping, as set forth in KRS
509.040, when the victim is under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of
the commission of the offense, except when the offense is committed by
Page 14 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
a parent;
2. Any person who has been convicted of unlawful imprisonment, as set
forth in KRS 509.020, when the victim is under the age of eighteen (18)
at the time of the commission of the offense, except when the offense is
committed by a parent;
3. Any person convicted of a sex crime:
a. Who has one (1) or more prior convictions of a felony criminal
offense against a victim who is a minor; or
b. Who has one (1) or more prior sex crime convictions;
4. Any person who has been convicted of two (2) or more felony criminal
offenses against a victim who is a minor;
5. Any person who has been convicted of:
a. Any degree of rape under KRS Chapter 510[Rape in the first
degree under KRS 510.040];[ or]
b. Any degree of sodomy under KRS Chapter 510[Sodomy in the
first degree under KRS 510.070];
c. Incest under KRS 530.020(2)(b) or (c);
d. Sexual abuse in the first degree under KRS 510.110(1)(b)2.; or
e. Any criminal attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any
of the offenses described in subdivisions a. to d. of this
subparagraph; and
6. Any sexually violent predator.
(3) All other registrants are required to register for twenty-five (25)[twenty (20)] years
following discharge from confinement or twenty-five (25)[twenty (20)] years
following the maximum discharge date on probation, shock probation, conditional
discharge, parole, or other form of early release, whichever period is greater.
(4) If a person required to register under this section is reincarcerated for another
Page 15 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
offense or as the result of having violated the terms of probation, parole,
postincarceration supervision, or conditional discharge, the registration
requirements and the remaining period of time for which the registrant shall register
are tolled during the reincarceration.
(5) A person who has pled guilty, entered an Alford plea, or been convicted in a court
of another state or territory, in a court of the United States, the District of
Columbia, or any federally recognized Indian tribe, or in a court-martial of the
United States Armed Forces who is required to register in Kentucky shall be subject
to registration in Kentucky based on the conviction in the foreign jurisdiction. The
[Justice and Public Safety ]cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of this subsection.
(6) The court shall designate the registration period as mandated by this section in its
judgment and shall cause a copy of its judgment to be mailed to the Information
Services Center, Department of Kentucky State Police, Frankfort, Kentucky 40601.
(7) If the court fails to designate the registration period as mandated by this section,
or the registrant has been:
(a) Convicted of a sex crime or criminal offense against a victim who is a minor
and has been notified of the duty to register by:
1. A court of any state or territory, a court of the United States, the
District of Columbia, or any federally recognized Indian tribe;
2. A similar conviction from a court of competent jurisdiction in any
other country; or
3. A court martial of the United States Armed Forces; or
(b) Committed as a sexually violent predator:
1. Under the laws of another state, laws of a territory, or federal laws; or
2. Has a similar commitment from a court of competent jurisdiction in
any other country;
Page 16 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
the Department of Kentucky State Police shall determine the registration period
as mandated by this section.
Section 4. KRS 17.580 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall establish a website[Web site]
available to the public. The website[Web site] shall display:
(a) The registrant information, except for:
1. Information that identifies a victim;[,]
2. DNA samples, fingerprints, and palm prints;[,]
3. Social Security numbers;[,]
4. Motor vehicle operator's license numbers;[,]
5. The name and address of the registrant's school or employer;
6. Copies of passports or documents establishing the registrant's
immigration status;
7. Copies of any occupational or professional licenses that authorize the
registrant to engage in an occupation or carry out a trade or business;
8. Designations used for self-identification or routing in internet
communications or postings; and
9. Government-issued identification card numbers obtained by the
Information Services Center, Department of Kentucky State Police,
under KRS 17.510;
(b) The sex offender information, except for information that identifies a victim,
DNA samples, Social Security numbers, and vehicle registration data,
obtained by the Information Services Center, Department of Kentucky State
Police, under KRS 17.510 prior to April 11, 2000; and
(c) The registrant's conviction, the elements of the offense for which the
registrant was convicted, whether the registrant is currently on probation or
parole, and whether the registrant is compliant or noncompliant.
Page 17 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
The website[Web site] shall be updated every day except for Saturdays, Sundays,
and state holidays.
(2) The information pertaining to an individual shall be maintained on the website[Web
site] so long as that individual is registered in accordance with KRS 17.500 to
17.580.
(3) The following language shall be prominently displayed on the website[Web site]:
"UNDER KRS 525.070 AND 525.080, USE OF INFORMATION OBTAINED
FROM THIS WEB SITE TO HARASS A PERSON IDENTIFIED ON THIS WEB
SITE IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE PUNISHABLE BY UP TO NINETY (90)
DAYS IN THE COUNTY JAIL. MORE SEVERE CRIMINAL PENALTIES
APPLY FOR MORE SEVERE CRIMES COMMITTED AGAINST A PERSON
IDENTIFIED ON THIS WEBSITE[WEB SITE]."
(4) (a) Any Department of Kentucky State Police employee who disseminates, or
does not disseminate, registrant information or sex offender information in
good-faith compliance with the requirements of this section shall be immune
from criminal and civil liability for the dissemination or lack thereof.
(b) Any person, including an employee of a sheriff's office, acting in good faith in
disseminating, or not disseminating, information previously disseminated by
the Department of Kentucky State Police shall be immune from criminal and
civil liability for the dissemination or lack thereof.
(5) On or before July 1, 2027, the website established under this section shall display,
in addition to the information required under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The name and address of any place where a registrant is employed or, if the
registrant is employed with no fixed place of employment, other information
describing where the registrant works; and
(b) For a vehicle including watercraft, aircraft, and motor vehicles owned or
routinely operated by the registrant:
Page 18 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
1. The license plate number or, if a vehicle has no license plate, the
registration number or other identifier;
2. A description of the vehicle, including the make, model, year
manufactured, and color; and
3. An address or other information describing the location where the
vehicle is habitually parked, docked, or otherwise kept[The cabinet
shall establish a toll-free telephone number for a person to call to learn
the identity of the Web site created in this section and the location of
public access to the Web site in the county where the person resides].
(6) In addition to the website[Web site,] a local law enforcement agency may provide
personal notification regarding the registrants located in its jurisdiction. Any
notification shall contain the warning specified in subsection (3) of this section.
Section 5. KRS 17.165 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:[,]
(a) "Criminal offense against a victim who is minor" means a conviction of or
a plea of guilty to a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as
specified in Section 1 of this Act;
(b) "Sex crime" means a conviction or a plea of guilty to a sex crime specified in
KRS 17.500; and[.]
(c)[(2)] [As used in this section, "Violent offender" means any person who has
been convicted of or pled guilty to the commission of a capital offense, Class
A felony, or Class B felony involving the death of the victim, or rape in the
first degree or sodomy in the first degree of the victim or serious physical
injury to a victim.
(3) As used in this section, ]"Violent crime" shall mean a conviction of or a plea of
guilty to the commission of a capital offense, Class A felony, or Class B felony
involving the death of the victim, or rape in the first degree or sodomy in the first
Page 19 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
degree of the victim or serious physical injury to a victim.[
(4) As used in this section, "criminal offense against a victim who is a minor" means a
conviction of or a plea of guilty to a criminal offense against a victim who is a
minor as specified in KRS 17.500(3).]
(2)[(5)] (a) Excluding a child care staff member pursuant to KRS 199.8965, the
provisions of this section shall apply to all applicants for initial employment
in a position which involves care and supervision of a minor as a child-
serving professional on or after March 27, 2017.
(b) Each employer of an applicant for initial employment in a position which
involves care and supervision of a minor as a child-serving professional shall
request all conviction information for the applicant for employment from the
Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or the Administrative Office of the Courts
prior to employing the applicant.
(c) This subsection shall not be construed to apply to an employer of a minor.
(3)[(6)] An[No] employee in a position which involves care and supervision of a
minor as a child-serving professional pursuant to subsection (2)[(5)] of this section
shall not have been convicted of a violent crime, a criminal offense against a victim
who is a minor, or a sex crime, or have been found by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services or a court to have abused or neglected a child.
(4)[(7)] Each application form, provided by the employer to the applicant, shall
conspicuously state the following: "FOR THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT,
STATE LAW REQUIRES A CRIMINAL RECORD CHECK AS A CONDITION
OF EMPLOYMENT."
(5)[(8)] Any request for records under subsection (2)[(5)] of this section shall be on a
form approved by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or the Administrative
Office of the Courts, and the cabinet may charge a fee to be paid by the applicant in
an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request.
Page 20 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
Section 6. KRS 160.151 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. A private, parochial, or church school that has voluntarily been certified
by the Kentucky Board of Education in accordance with KRS
156.160(2) may require a national and state criminal background check
and require a clear CA/N check, as defined in KRS 160.380, on all new
certified hires in the school and student teachers assigned to the school
and may require a new national and state criminal background check
and require a clear CA/N check on each certified teacher once every five
(5) years of employment.
2. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified position in
a Kentucky school within six (6) months of the date of the hire and who
had previously submitted to a national and state criminal background
check and were required to have a clear CA/N check for previous
employment may be excluded from the initial national or state criminal
background checks.
(b) The national criminal history background check shall be conducted by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation. The state criminal history background check
shall be conducted by the Department of Kentucky State Police or the
Administrative Office of the Courts.
(c) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation by
the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal background
check has been conducted. Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky
State Police, the Administrative Office of the Courts, or the Federal Bureau of
Investigation shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing
the request and conducting the search.
Page 21 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
(2) (a) If a school requires a criminal background check or requires a clear CA/N
check for a new hire, the school shall conspicuously include the following
disclosure statement on each application or renewal form provided by the
employer to an applicant for a certified position: "STATE LAW
AUTHORIZES THIS SCHOOL TO REQUIRE A CRIMINAL HISTORY
BACKGROUND CHECK AND A LETTER FROM THE CABINET FOR
HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT IS
CLEAR TO HIRE BASED ON NO FINDINGS OF SUBSTANTIATED
CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND
CHECK OF CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS AS A
CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT FOR THIS TYPE OF POSITION."
(b) The school or school board may require an adult who is permitted access to
school grounds on a regularly scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a
written agreement for the purpose of providing services directly to a student
or students as part of a school-sponsored program or activity, a volunteer, or a
visitor to submit to a national criminal history check by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and state criminal history background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police or Administrative Office of the Courts and require a
clear CA/N check.
(c) Any request for records from the Department of Kentucky State Police under
this section shall be on an applicant fingerprint card provided by the
Department of Kentucky State Police if required. The results of the state
criminal background check and the results of the national criminal history
background check, if requested, shall be sent to the hiring superintendent. If a
background check of child abuse and neglect records is requested, the person
seeking employment shall provide to the hiring superintendent a clear CA/N
check.
Page 22 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
(d) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
(3) (a) A nonpublic school voluntarily implementing the provisions of this chapter
may choose not to employ any person who[ is a violent offender as defined by
KRS 17.165(2),] has been convicted of a sex crime which is classified as a
felony as defined by KRS 17.165[(1),] or has committed a violent crime as
defined in KRS 17.165[(3)] or persons with a substantiated finding of child
abuse or neglect in records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services. A nonpublic school may employ, at its discretion, persons convicted
of sex crimes classified as a misdemeanor.
(b) If a school term has begun and a certified position remains unfilled or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a nonpublic school implementing this
chapter may employ an individual who will have supervisory or disciplinary
authority over minors on probationary status pending receipt of a criminal
history background check or the receipt of a clear CA/N check, provided by
the individual.
(c) Employment at a nonpublic school implementing this chapter may be
contingent on the receipt of a criminal history background check documenting
a record[ as a violent offender,] of a sex crime[,] or[ of] a violent crime as
defined in KRS 17.165 or the receipt of a clear CA/N check, provided by the
individual.
(d) Nonpublic schools implementing this chapter may terminate probationary
employment under this section upon receipt of a criminal history background
check documenting a record[ as a violent offender,] of a sex crime[,] or[ of] a
violent crime as defined in KRS 17.165 or the receipt of a clear CA/N check.
(4) The form for requesting a clear CA/N check shall be made available on the Cabinet
Page 23 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
for Health and Family Services website.
Section 7. KRS 160.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administrative finding of child abuse or neglect" means a substantiated
finding of child abuse or neglect issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services that is:
1. Not appealed through an administrative hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
2. Upheld at an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B and not appealed to a Circuit Court; or
3. Upheld by a Circuit Court in an appeal of the results of an
administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) "Alternative education program" means a program that exists to meet the
needs of students that cannot be addressed in a traditional classroom setting
but through the assignment of students to alternative classrooms, centers, or
campuses that are designed to remediate academic performance, improve
behavior, or provide an enhanced learning experience. Alternative education
programs do not include career or technical centers or departments;
(c) "Clear CA/N check" means a letter from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services indicating that there are no administrative findings of child abuse or
neglect relating to a specific individual;
(d) "Relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son and
daughter; and
(e) "Vacancy" means any certified position opening created by the resignation,
dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or death of a certified staff
member of a local school district, or a new position created in a local school
district for which certification is required. However, if an employer-employee
Page 24 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
bargained contract contains procedures for filling certified position openings
created by the resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or
death of a certified staff member, or creation of a new position for which
certification is required, a vacancy shall not exist, unless certified positions
remain open after compliance with those procedures.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 160.346, the school district personnel actions identified
in this section shall be carried out as follows:
(a) All appointments, promotions, and transfers of principals, supervisors,
teachers, and other public school employees shall be made only by the
superintendent of schools, who shall notify the board of the action taken. All
employees of the local district shall have the qualifications prescribed by law
and by the administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education and
of the employing board. Supervisors, principals, teachers, and other
employees may be appointed by the superintendent for any school year at any
time after February 1 preceding the beginning of the school year. No
superintendent of schools shall appoint or transfer himself or herself to
another position within the school district;
(b) When a vacancy occurs in a local school district, the superintendent shall
submit the job posting to the statewide job posting system described in KRS
160.152 fifteen (15) days before the position shall be filled. The local school
district shall post position openings in the local board office for public
viewing;
(c) When a vacancy needs to be filled in less than fifteen (15) days' time to
prevent disruption of necessary instructional or support services of the school
district, the superintendent may seek a waiver from the chief state school
officer outside of the process established in KRS 156.161. If the waiver is
approved, the appointment shall not be made until the person recommended
Page 25 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
for the position has been approved by the chief state school officer. The chief
state school officer shall respond to a district's request for waiver or for
approval of an appointment within two (2) working days; and
(d) When a vacancy occurs in a local district, the superintendent shall conduct a
search to locate minority teachers to be considered for the position. The
superintendent shall, pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky
Board of Education, report annually the district's recruitment process and the
activities used to increase the percentage of minority teachers in the district.
(3) Restrictions on employment of relatives shall be as follows:
(a) No relative of a superintendent of schools shall be an employee of the school
district. However, this shall not apply to a relative who is a classified or
certified employee of the school district for at least thirty-six (36) months
prior to the superintendent assuming office and who is qualified for the
position the employee holds. A superintendent's spouse who has previously
been employed in a school system may be an employee of the school district.
A superintendent's spouse who is employed under this provision shall not hold
a position in which the spouse supervises certified or classified employees. A
superintendent's spouse may supervise teacher aides and student teachers.
However, the superintendent shall not promote a relative who continues
employment under an exception of this subsection;
(b) No superintendent shall employ a relative of a school board member of the
district;
(c) No principal's relative shall be employed in the principal's school; and
(d) A relative that is ineligible for employment under paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection may be employed as a substitute for a certified or classified
employee if the relative is not:
1. A regular full-time or part-time employee of the district;
Page 26 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
2. Accruing continuing contract status or any other right to continuous
employment;
3. Receiving fringe benefits other than those provided other substitutes; or
4. Receiving preference in employment or assignment over other
substitutes.
(4) No superintendent shall assign a certified or classified staff person to an alternative
education program as part of any disciplinary action taken pursuant to KRS 161.011
or 161.790 as part of a corrective action plan established pursuant to the local
district evaluation plan.
(5) No superintendent shall employ in any position in the district any person who:
(a) Has been convicted of an offense that would classify a person as a violent
offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) Has been convicted of a sex crime as defined by KRS 17.500 or a
misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510;
(c) Is required to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.500 to 17.580; or
(d) Has an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained
by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(6) Requirements for background checks shall be as follows:
(a) A superintendent shall require the following individuals to submit to a
national and state criminal background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual:
1. Each new certified or classified hire;
2. A nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant as defined under KRS
161.185;
3. A student teacher;
4. A school-based decision making council parent member; and
Page 27 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
5. Any adult who is permitted access to school grounds on a regularly
scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a written agreement for the
purpose of providing services directly to a student or students as part of
a school-sponsored program or activity;
(b) 1. The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to:
a. Classified and certified individuals employed by the school district
prior to June 27, 2019;
b. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified
position in a Kentucky school district within six (6) months of the
date of hire and who had previously submitted to a national and
state criminal background check and who have a clear CA/N check
for the previous employment; or
c. Student teachers who have submitted to and provide a copy of a
national and state criminal background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
through an accredited teacher education institution in which the
student teacher is enrolled and who have a clear CA/N check.
2. The Education Professional Standards Board may promulgate
administrative regulations to impose additional qualifications to meet
the requirements of Pub. L. No. 92-544;
(c) A parent member may serve prior to the receipt of the criminal history
background check and CA/N letter required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection but shall be removed from the council on receipt by the school
district of a report documenting a record of abuse or neglect, or a sex crime or
criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in KRS 17.500, or
as a violent crime[offender] as defined in KRS 17.165, and no further
procedures shall be required;
Page 28 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
(d) A superintendent may require a volunteer or a visitor to submit to a national
and state criminal history background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual; and
(e) The superintendent of a school district operating under an alternative
transportation plan approved by the Kentucky Department of Education in
accordance with KRS 156.153(3) shall require the driver of any non-school
bus passenger vehicle authorized to transport students to and from school
pursuant to the alternative transportation plan who does not have a valid
commercial driver's license issued in accordance with KRS Chapter 281A
with an "S" endorsement to:
1. Submit to a national and state criminal background check by the
Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation at least once every three (3) years and a criminal records
check conducted in accordance with KRS 27A.090 in all other years;
2. Submit to drug testing consistent with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt.
40;
3. Provide a biannual driving history record check performed by the
Transportation Cabinet;
4. Provide an annual clear CA/N check;
5. Immediately notify the superintendent of any conviction for a violation
under KRS Chapter 189 for which penalty points are assessed; and
6. Immediately notify the superintendent of any citation or arrest for a
violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 189A. The superintendent
shall inform the Kentucky Department of Education of the notification.
(7) (a) If a certified or classified position remains unfilled after July 31 or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a superintendent may employ an
Page 29 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
individual, who will have supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors,
on probationary status pending receipt of the criminal history background
check and a clear CA/N check, provided by the individual. Application for the
criminal record and a request for a clear CA/N check of a probationary
employee shall be made no later than the date probationary employment
begins.
(b) Employment shall be contingent on the receipt of the criminal history
background check documenting that the probationary employee has no record
of a sex crime or[nor as] a violent crime[offender] as defined in KRS 17.165
and receipt of a letter, provided by the individual, from the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services stating the employee is clear to hire based on no
administrative findings of child abuse or neglect found through a background
check of child abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 161.720 to 161.800 or any other statute to the contrary,
probationary employment under this section shall terminate on receipt by the
school district of a criminal history background check documenting a record
of a sex crime or[ as] a violent crime[offender] as defined in KRS 17.165 and
no further procedures shall be required.
(8) The provisions of KRS 161.790 shall apply to terminate employment of a certified
employee on the basis of a criminal record other than a record of a sex crime or[ as]
a violent crime[offender] as defined in KRS 17.165, or on the basis of a CA/N
check showing an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect.
(9) (a) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
from the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal
Page 30 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
background check is conducted. The results of the state and federal criminal
background check shall be sent to the hiring superintendent. Any fee charged
by the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
(b) Each application form, provided by the employer to an applicant for a
certified or classified position, shall conspicuously state the following: "FOR
THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL
AND STATE CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES."
(c) Each application form for a district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Identify the states in which he or she has maintained residency,
including the dates of residency; and
2. Provide picture identification.
(10) Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary,
when an employee of the school district is charged with any offense which is
classified as a felony, the superintendent may transfer the employee to a second
position until such time as the employee is found not guilty, the charges are
dismissed, the employee is terminated, or the superintendent determines that further
personnel action is not required. The employee shall continue to be paid at the same
rate of pay he or she received prior to the transfer. If an employee is charged with
Page 31 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
an offense outside of the Commonwealth, this provision may also be applied if the
charge would have been treated as a felony if committed within the
Commonwealth. Transfers shall be made to prevent disruption of the educational
process and district operations and in the interest of students and staff and shall not
be construed as evidence of misconduct.
(11) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each certified and classified employee of
the school district shall notify the superintendent if he or she has been found by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services to have abused or neglected a child, and if
he or she has waived the right to appeal a substantiated finding of child abuse or
neglect or if the substantiated incident was upheld upon appeal. Any failure to
report this finding shall result in the certified or classified employee being subject
to dismissal or termination.
(12) The form for requesting a CA/N check shall be made available on the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services website.
Section 8. KRS 161.185 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2), boards of education shall require a certified or
classified staff member who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age to accompany
students on all school-sponsored or school-endorsed trips. Local boards of
education may adopt a policy that specifies the job classifications of staff members
who may accompany students on trips under this section.
(2) Boards of education may permit a nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant, as
defined by administrative regulation promulgated by the Kentucky Board of
Education under KRS 156.070(2), to accompany students on all school-sponsored
or school-endorsed athletic trips. A nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant shall
be at least twenty-one (21) years of age, shall not be[ a violent offender or]
convicted of a sex crime or violent crime as defined by KRS 17.165 which is
classified as a felony, and shall submit to a criminal record check under KRS
Page 32 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2396
160.380.
(3) Prior to assuming his or her duties, a nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant shall
successfully complete training provided by the local school district. The training
shall include, but not be limited to, information on the physical and emotional
development of students of the age with whom the nonfaculty coach and nonfaculty
assistant will be working, the district's and school's discipline policies, procedures
for dealing with discipline problems, and safety and first aid training. Follow-up
training shall be provided annually.
Page 33 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 10:46 AM Jacketed